Washington statutes.
RCW 16.52.230

Remedies not impaired.

No provision of RCW 9.08.070 through 9.08.078 or 16.52.220 shall in any way interfere with or impair the operation of any other provision of this chapter or Title 28B RCW, relating to higher education or biomedical research. The provisions of RCW 9.08.070 through 9.08.078 and 16.52.220 are cumulative and nonexclusive and shall not affect any other remedy.

[ 2003 c 53 s 114; 1989 c 359 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.